Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
PREMIUM SUPPLEMENTATION

§393-41 Establishment of premium
supplementation trust fund. There is established in the treasury of the
State, separate and apart from all public moneys or funds of the State, a trust
fund for premium supplementation which shall be administered exclusively for
the purposes of this chapter. All premium supplementations payable under this
part shall be paid from the fund. The fund shall consist of:

(1) All money appropriated by the State for the
purposes of premium supplementation under this part; and

(2) All fines and penalties collected pursuant
to this chapter. [L 1974, c 210, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 100, §7]

Revision Note

In the last sentence, (1) and (2) reformatted as paragraphs
(1) and (2), and in paragraph (1), punctuation added pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next